pt-PT: Textura da prancha de mergulho: Antiderrapante; Canelado; Macio; Texturizado; Com relevo; Outro
zh-CN: 跳板表面纹理: 防滑; 棱纹; 光滑; 表面有纹理; 条纹; 其他
en: Diving board surface texture: Non-slip; Ribbed; Smooth; Textured; Treaded; Other
es: Textura de la superficie del trampolín: Antideslizante; Acanalado; Suave; Texturizado; Grabada; Otros
sv: Ytstruktur för hoppbräda: Antiglid; Ribbad; Slät; Texturerad; Mönstrad; Övrigt
el: Υφή επιφάνειας βατήρα: Αντιολισθητική; Ραβδωτή; Λεία; Με υφή; Με πέλμα; Άλλο
fi: Ponnahduslaudan pintatekstuuri: Liukumaton; Harjanteinen; Sileä; Teksturoitu; Uritettu; Muu
sk-SK: Povrchová štruktúra bazénového skokanského mostíka: Protišmykový; Vrúbkovaný; Hladký; Štruktúrovaný; Profilovaný; Iné
sl-SI: Tekstura površine odskočne deske: Nedrseča; Rebrasta; Gladka; Teksturiran; Profilirano; Druga
ja: 飛び込み台表面の質感: ノンスリップ; リブ付き; スムース; テクスチャ加工; トレッド; その他
vi: Kết cấu bề mặt ván nhảy: Chống trượt; Có gân; Nhẵn; Có họa tiết; Có rãnh; Khác
hu: Ugródeszka felületi textúrája: Csúszásmentes; Bordázott; Sima; Texturált; Recés; Egyéb
it: Finitura della superficie del trampolino: Antiscivolo; A coste; Liscio; Strutturato; Zigrinata; Altro
bg-BG: Текстура на повърхността на трамплина: Неплъзгащо се; Оребрено; Гладко; Текстурирано; Релефно; Друго
hr-HR: Tekstura površine odskočne daske: Neklizajuća; Rebrasta; Glatka; Teksturirana; Gazište; Ostalo
nl: Oppervlaktetextuur van de duikplank: Antislip; Geribbeld; Glad; Getextureerd; Met profiel; Overig
cs: Textura povrchu skákacího prkna: Protiskluzový; S žebrováním; Hladký; Strukturovaný povrch; Nášlapná vrstva; Jiný
pt-BR: Textura da superfície do trampolim: Antiderrapante; Com nervuras; Suave; Texturizado; Com ranhuras; Outro
th: พื้นผิวของกระดานกระโดดน้ำ: กันลื่น; แบบร่อง; เรียบ; มีพื้นผิว; ดอกยาง; อื่นๆ
nb: Overflatetekstur på stupebrett: Antiskli; Med riller; Glatt; Teksturert; Riflet; Annet
ko: 다이빙 보드 표면 질감: 미끄럼 방지; 요철; 매끄러운 질감; 텍스처드; 트레드형; 기타
fr: Texture de la surface du plongeoir: Antidérapant; Nervuré; Lisse; Texturé; Cranté; Autre
ro-RO: Textura suprafeței trambulinei: Antiderapant; Cu nervuri; Netedă; Texturată; Profilată; Altele
pl: Tekstura powierzchni trampoliny: Antypoślizgowe; Ryflowana; Gładka; Teksturowana; Bieżnikowana; Pozostałe
ru: Текстура поверхности трамплина для прыжков в воду: Нескользящая; Ребристая; Гладкая; Текстурированная; С протектором; Другая
da: Dykkerbræts overfladetekstur: Skridsikker; Med riller; Glat; Tekstureret; Med mønster; Andet
zh-TW: 跳板表面紋理: 防滑; 羅紋; 光滑; 紋理; 防滑紋; 其他
tr: Atlama tahtası yüzey dokusu: Kaymaz; Yivli; Düz; Dokulu; Dişli; Diğer
lt-LT: Nardymo lentos paviršiaus tekstūra: Neslystantis; Briaunotas; Glotnus; Tekstūruota; Su protektoriumi; Kita
de: Oberflächenstruktur des Sprungbretts: Rutschfest; Gerippt; Glatt; Texturiert; Profiliert; Sonstiges